arapahoverbs.lexc
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@koxuutenih@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^koxuutenih^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@koxuuteninoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^koxuuteninoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cecii'inoo'ootiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cecii'inoo'ootiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hooxo3oowu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hooxo3oowu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@3i'en@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^3i'en^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@yoo3onisiw@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^yoo3onisiw^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cii'iisiixonee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cii'iisiixonee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hootoh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hootoh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ni'okoo3oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ni'okoo3oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cee3iihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cee3iihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hii3einooneniini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hii3einooneniini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ce3nee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ce3nee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ce3kuhnee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ce3kuhnee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ce3koohuuw@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ce3koohuuw^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ce3koohuutooni@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ce3koohuutooni^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ce3koohuuhei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ce3koohuuhei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ce3koohuuh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ce3koohuuh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ce3koohu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ce3koohu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ce3koni@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ce3koni^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ho'ei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ho'ei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ceece'ixonee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ceece'ixonee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ho'ben@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ho'ben^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@koxkohei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^koxkohei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@biinee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^biinee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@biin@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^biin^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@3oo3eenobee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^3oo3eenobee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@3oo3eeneet@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^3oo3eeneet^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@3oo3eenow@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^3oo3eenow^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoowuxoxooyeihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoowuxoxooyeihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoowuyootiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoowuyootiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoowuxoxooyoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoowuxoxooyoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hineehebeh'iw@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hineehebeh'iw^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@kookootooyei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^kookootooyei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@coo'utii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^coo'utii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@coo'uh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^coo'uh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@coo'uw@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^coo'uw^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@coo'utii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^coo'utii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ko'ooku@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ko'ooku^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@koo'ookuunoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^koo'ookuunoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@honoyei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^honoyei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@co'ouu3i@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^co'ouu3i^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@co'ouu3eihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^co'ouu3eihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nii'ooteihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nii'ooteihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoonoyoohow@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoonoyoohow^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoonoyoohoot@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoonoyoohoot^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noxuuteikoohu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noxuuteikoohu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noh'ookono'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noh'ookono'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noh'ookenini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noh'ookenini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noh'ookonoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noh'ookonoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noh'ooben@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noh'ooben^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noh'ooke@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noh'ooke^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nookoo3isee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nookoo3isee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noh'ooteewoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noh'ooteewoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noh'oosoon@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noh'oosoon^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nookoteheinoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nookoteheinoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hii3ooxuh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hii3ooxuh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@neehii3ei'eekuu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^neehii3ei'eekuu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@niitookooyootiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^niitookooyootiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@niitookooyei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^niitookooyei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@niitookoh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^niitookoh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@niitoo'ei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^niitoo'ei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@niitonetiitooni@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^niitonetiitooni^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@no'uxoh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^no'uxoh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@xouuwootii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^xouuwootii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@xouuwootee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^xouuwootee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@xouuwooteeneet@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^xouuwooteeneet^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nih'oo3ouyeiti@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nih'oo3ouyeiti^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nih'oo3ouwoxuunotootiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nih'oo3ouwoxuunotootiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nestoo'eebi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nestoo'eebi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@niiteheit@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^niiteheit^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noxu3ecoot@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noxu3ecoot^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
